Utah statutes.
54-4-26.   Contracts calling for expenditures -- Commission to approve.

Every public utility when ordered by the commission shall, before entering into any contract for construction work or for the purchase of new facilities or with respect to any other expenditures, submit such proposed contract, purchase or other expenditure to the commission for its approval; and, if the commission finds that any such proposed contract, purchase or other expenditure diverts, directly or indirectly, the funds of such public utility to any of its officers or stockholders or to any corporation in which they are interested, or is not proposed in good faith for the economic benefit of such public utility, the commission shall withhold its approval of such contract, purchase or other expenditure, and may order other contracts, purchases or expenditures in lieu thereof for the legitimate purposes and economic welfare of such public utility.



No Change Since 1953

